Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-509.02
Cash balance; expenditure limitation; exceeded; when; section, how construed.

The restriction on expenditures in section 13-509.01 may be exceeded upon the express finding of the governing body of the political subdivision that expenditures beyond the amount authorized are necessary to enable the political subdivision to meet its statutory duties and responsibilities. The finding and approval of the expenditures in excess of the statutory authorization shall be adopted by the governing body of the political subdivision in open public session of the governing body. Expenditures authorized by this section shall be charged against appropriations for each individual fund or purpose as provided in the budget when adopted, and nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize expenditures by the political subdivision in excess of that authorized by any other statutory provision.

Laws 1994, LB 1257, § 1.